tests/ger1.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "ger1": 
    диэ<v><tv><ger1> : диэн
    диэ<v><tv><neg><ger1> : диэмиэн
    аһаа<v><tv><ger1> : аһыан
    аһаа<v><tv><neg><ger1> : аһыамыан
    төрөө<v><iv><ger1> : төрүөн
    төрөө<v><iv><neg><ger1> : төрүөмүөн
    ыа<v><tv><ger1> : ыан
    ыа<v><tv><neg><ger1> : ыамымыан
